Illinois, session 104th, HB1075.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 197 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/197 new)7    Sec. 197. Diwali Day. In accordance with the official day 8recognized by the government of the Republic of India, the 915th day of the Hindu lunisolar month of Kartika is designated 10as Diwali Day, to be observed through the State by the many 11Illinoisans who celebrate Diwali, also known as the festival 12of lights, as a day of thanksgiving and reflection.